Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part  of ORS 456.255 to
456.267.
SECTION 2. The Housing and Community Services Department  shall maintain on the
department’s website information in  the department’s possession with respect to publicly
supported housing, including information on:
(1) The expiration dates of the affordability restrictions;
(2) The number of housing units;
(3) The type and source of rental assistance;
(4) Income eligibility levels; and
(5) The current status of preservation efforts, if any.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 32 (SB 32-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate April 2, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 8, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 32 (SB 32-A) Page 2